Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-1204
Materiel division; comprehensive report; duties.

On or before April 1, 2028, and on or before April 1 of each year thereafter, the division shall compile the information reported under section 73-1203 and shall electronically submit a comprehensive report regarding such information to the Governor, the Clerk of the Legislature, and the Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature. The division shall also make the comprehensive report available on the website of the Department of Administrative Services.

Laws 2026, LB1135, § 4.
July 18, 2026